California statutes. Elections Code
Notwithstanding any provision of the bond act, if the Treasurer sells bonds under this article for which bond counsel has issued an opinion to the effect that the interest on the bonds is excludable from gross income for purposes of federal income tax, subject to any conditions which may be designated, the Treasurer may establish separate accounts for the investment of bond proceeds and for the earnings on those proceeds, and may use those proceeds or earnings to pay any rebate, penalty, or other payment required by federal law or take any other action with respect to the investment and use of bond proceeds required or permitted under federal law necessary to maintain the tax-exempt status of the bonds or to obtain any
 other advantage under federal law on behalf of the funds of this state.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19244 by Stats. 2013, Ch. 602, Sec. 63.   (SB 360)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Note: This section (as originally numbered) was added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 902, and approved in Prop. 41 on March 5, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

19266.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that, inasmuch as the proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by this article are not “proceeds of taxes” as that term is used in Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, the disbursement of these proceeds is not subject to the limitations imposed by Article XIIIB.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19245 by Stats. 2013, Ch. 602, Sec. 64.   (SB 360)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Note: This section (as originally numbered) was added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 902, and approved in Prop. 41 on March 5, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Direct Recording Electronic Voting Systems [19270. - 19275.]

19270.

(a) The Secretary of State shall not certify or conditionally approve a direct recording electronic voting system unless the system includes an accessible voter verified paper audit trail.

(b) On and after January 1, 2006, a city or county shall not contract for or purchase a direct recording electronic voting system unless the system has been certified or conditionally approved for use by the Secretary of State.

(c) As of January 1, 2006, all direct recording electronic voting systems in use on that date, regardless of the date it was contracted for or purchased, shall have received
 federal qualification and include an accessible voter verified paper audit trail. If the direct recording electronic voting system does not include an accessible voter verified paper audit trail, the system shall be replaced or modified to include an accessible voter verified paper audit trail.

 (d) All direct recording electronic voting systems shall include a method by which a voter may electronically verify, through a nonvisual method, the information that is contained on the paper record copy of that voter’s ballot.

 (e) A paper record copy that is printed by a voter verified paper audit trail component shall be printed in the same language that the voter used when casting his or her ballot on the direct recording electronic voting system. For languages that lack a written form,
 the paper record copy shall be printed in English.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19250 by Stats. 2013, Ch. 602, Sec. 66.   (SB 360)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

19271.

As used in this article:

(a) “Accessible” means that the information provided on the paper cast vote record from the voter verified paper audit trail mechanism is provided or conveyed to voters via both a visual and a nonvisual method, such as through an audio component.

(b) “Direct recording electronic voting system” means a voting system that records a vote electronically and does not require or permit the voter to record his or her vote directly onto a tangible ballot.

(c) “Voter verified paper audit trail” means a paper cast vote record containing a copy of
 each of the voter’s selections that allows each voter to confirm his or her selections before the voter casts his or her ballot for systems that do not contain a paper ballot.

(d) “Paper cast vote record” means an auditable document that corresponds to the selection made on the voter’s ballot and lists the contests on the ballot and the voter’s selections for those contests. A paper cast vote record is not a ballot.

(e) “Parallel monitoring” means the testing of a randomly selected sampling of voting equipment on election day designed to simulate actual election conditions to confirm that the system is registering votes accurately.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 75, Sec. 5.   (AB 2252)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

19272.

To the extent that they are available for expenditure for the purposes of this article, federal funds or moneys from the Voting Modernization Fund, created pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 19254, shall be used. No moneys from the General Fund shall be expended for the purposes of this article.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19252 by Stats. 2013, Ch. 602, Sec. 68.   (SB 360)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

19273.

(a) On a direct recording electronic voting system, the electronic record of each vote shall be considered the official record of the vote, except as provided in subdivision (b).

(b) (1) The voter verified paper audit trail shall be considered the official paper audit record and shall be used for the required 1-percent manual tally described in Section 15360 and any full recount or post-election audit.

(2) The voter verified paper audit trail shall govern if there is any difference between it and the electronic record during a 1-percent manual tally, full recount, or
 post-election audit.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19253 by Stats. 2013, Ch. 602, Sec. 69.   (SB 360)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

19274.

The Secretary of State shall not certify or conditionally approve a direct recording electronic voting system unless the paper used for its voter verified paper audit trail is of sufficient quality that it maintains its integrity and readability throughout the retention period specified in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 17300) of Division 17.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19254 by Stats. 2013, Ch. 602, Sec. 70.   (SB 360)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

19275.

(a) For each statewide election, the Secretary of State shall conduct parallel monitoring of each direct recording electronic voting system on which ballots will be cast. This section shall only apply to precincts that have more than one direct recording electronic voting system.

(b) The results of the parallel monitoring shall be made available prior to the certification of the election.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19255 by Stats. 2013, Ch. 602, Sec. 71.   (SB 360)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3.5. Certification of Remote Accessible Vote By Mail Systems [19280. - 19295.]

19280.

The Secretary of State shall not certify or conditionally approve a remote accessible vote by mail system, or part of a remote accessible vote by mail system, unless it fulfills the requirements of this code and the regulations of the Secretary of State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 75, Sec. 7.   (AB 2252)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

19281.

(a) A remote accessible vote by mail system, in whole or in part, shall not be used unless it has been certified or conditionally approved by the Secretary of State before the election at which it is to be first used. The Secretary of State may impose additional conditions of approval as deemed necessary for the certification of the remote accessible vote by mail system.

(b) All other uses of a remote accessible vote by mail system shall be subject to the provisions of Section 19202.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 605, Sec. 14.   (SB 1328)   Effective September 25, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

19283.

(a) The Secretary of State shall adopt and publish standards and regulations governing the use of remote accessible vote by mail systems.

(b) Remote accessible vote by mail system standards adopted by the Secretary of State pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following requirements:

(1) The machine or device and its software shall be suitable for the purpose for which it is intended.

(2) The remote
 accessible vote by mail system shall preserve the secrecy of the ballot.

(3) The remote accessible vote by mail system shall be safe from fraud or manipulation.

(4) The remote accessible vote by mail system shall be accessible to voters with disabilities and to voters who require assistance in a language other than English if the language is one in which a ballot or ballot materials are required to be made available to voters.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 75, Sec. 10.   (AB 2252)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

19284.

(a) A person, corporation, or public agency owning or having an interest in the sale or acquisition of a remote accessible vote by mail system or a part of a remote accessible vote by mail system may apply to the Secretary of State for certification or conditional approval that includes testing and examination of the applicant’s system and a report on the findings, which shall include the accuracy and efficiency of the remote accessible vote by mail system. As part of its application, the applicant of a remote accessible vote by mail system or a part of a remote accessible vote by mail system shall notify the Secretary of State in writing of any known defect, fault, or failure of the version of the hardware, software, or firmware of the remote accessible vote by mail system or a part of the remote accessible vote by mail system
 submitted. The Secretary of State shall not begin their certification process until they receive a completed application from the applicant of the remote accessible vote by mail system or a part of the remote accessible vote by mail system. The applicant shall also notify the Secretary of State in writing of any defect, fault, or failure of the version of the hardware, software, or firmware of the ballot marking system or a part of the ballot marking system submitted that is discovered after the application is submitted and before the Secretary of State submits the report required by Section 19288. The Secretary of State shall complete their examination without undue delay.

(b) As used in this chapter:

(1) “Defect” means any flaw in the hardware or documentation of a remote accessible vote by mail system that could result in a state of unfitness for use or nonconformance to the
 manufacturer’s specifications or applicable law.

(2) “Failure” means a discrepancy between the external results of the operation of any software or firmware in a remote accessible vote by mail system and the manufacturer’s product requirements for that software or firmware or applicable law.

(3) “Fault” means a step, process, or data definition in any software or firmware in a ballot marking system that is incorrect under the manufacturer’s program specification or applicable law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 238, Sec. 12.   (SB 851)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

19285.

The Secretary of State shall use a state-approved testing agency or expert technicians to examine remote accessible vote by mail systems proposed for use or sale in this state. He or she shall furnish a complete report of the findings of the examination and testing to the Governor and the Attorney General.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 75, Sec. 12.   (AB 2252)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

19286.

The person, corporation, or public agency applying for certification of a remote accessible vote by mail system is responsible for all costs associated with the testing and examination of the remote accessible vote by mail system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 75, Sec. 13.   (AB 2252)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

19287.

(a) Prior to publishing his or her decision to certify, conditionally approve, or withhold certification of a remote accessible vote by mail system, the Secretary of State shall provide for a 30-day public review period and conduct a public hearing to give interested persons an opportunity to review testing and examination reports and express their views for or against certification or conditional approval of the remote accessible vote by mail system.

(b) The Secretary of State shall give notice of the public review period and hearing in the manner prescribed in Section 6064 of the Government Code in a newspaper of general circulation published in Sacramento County. The Secretary
 of State shall also provide notice of the hearing on his or her Internet Web site. The Secretary of State shall transmit written notice of the hearing, at least 14 days prior to the public review period and hearing, to each county elections official, to any person that the Secretary of State believes will be interested in the public review period and hearing, and to any person who requests, in writing, notice of the public review period and hearing.

(c) The decision of the Secretary of State to certify, conditionally approve, or withhold certification of a remote accessible vote by mail system shall be in writing and shall state the findings of the Secretary of State. The decision shall be open to public inspection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 75, Sec. 14.   (AB 2252)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

19288.

Within 60 days after the completion of the examination of a remote accessible vote by mail system, the Secretary of State shall make publicly available a report stating whether the remote accessible vote by mail system has been certified or conditionally approved, or whether certification has been withheld.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 75, Sec. 15.   (AB 2252)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

19289.

Within 10 days after issuing and filing a certification decision and associated testing reports, the Secretary of State shall make available to the public a full and complete copy of the certification report and all associated documentation, except that portions of the report or documentation that contain information that the Secretary of State determines to be confidential or proprietary shall not be made publicly available. The Secretary of State shall notify the board of supervisors and elections official of each county of the availability of the report and associated documentation.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19269 by Stats. 2013, Ch. 602, Sec. 82.   (SB 360)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

19290.

If a remote accessible vote by mail system has been certified or conditionally approved by the Secretary of State, the vendor or, in cases where the system is publicly owned, the jurisdiction shall notify the Secretary of State and all local elections officials who use the system in writing of any defect, fault, or failure of the hardware, software, or firmware of any system or part of any system created or manufactured by the vendor, or supplied by the vendor to any jurisdiction, within 30 calendar days after the vendor or jurisdiction learns of the defect, fault, or failure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 238, Sec. 13.   (SB 851)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

19291.

If a remote accessible vote by mail system has been certified or conditionally approved by the Secretary of State, it shall not be changed or modified until the Secretary of State has been notified in writing and has determined that the change or modification does not impair its accuracy and efficiency sufficient to require a reexamination and recertification or reapproval pursuant to this chapter. The Secretary of State may adopt rules and regulations governing the procedures to be followed in making his or her determination as to whether the change or modification impairs accuracy or efficiency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 75, Sec. 17.   (AB 2252)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

19292.

The Secretary of State may seek injunctive and administrative relief if a remote accessible vote by mail system has been compromised by the addition or deletion of hardware, software, or firmware without prior approval or is defective due to a known hardware, software, or firmware defect, fault, or failure that has not been disclosed pursuant to Section 19284 or 19290.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 75, Sec. 18.   (AB 2252)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

19293.

(a) The Secretary of State may seek all of the following relief for an unauthorized change in hardware, software, or firmware in a remote accessible vote by mail system certified or conditionally approved in California:

(1) A civil penalty from the offending party or parties, not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per violation. For purposes of this subdivision, each remote accessible vote by mail system component found to contain the unauthorized hardware, software, or firmware shall be considered a separate violation. A penalty imposed pursuant to this subdivision shall be apportioned 50 percent to the county in which the violation occurred, if applicable, and 50 percent to
 the office of the Secretary of State for purposes of bolstering remote accessible vote by mail system security efforts.

(2) Immediate commencement of proceedings to withdraw certification or conditional approval for the remote
 accessible vote by mail system in question.

(3) Prohibiting the manufacturer or vendor of a remote accessible vote by mail system from doing elections-related business in the state for one, two, or three years.

(4) Refund of all moneys paid by a local agency for a remote accessible vote by mail system or a part of a
 remote accessible vote by mail system that is compromised by an unauthorized change or modification, whether or not the
 remote accessible vote by mail system has been used in an election.

(5) Any other remedial actions authorized by law to prevent unjust enrichment of the offending party.

(b) (1) The Secretary of State may seek all of the following relief for a known but undisclosed defect, fault, or failure in a remote accessible vote by mail system or part of a remote accessible vote by mail system certified or conditionally approved in California:

(A) Refund of all moneys paid by a local agency for a remote accessible vote by mail system or part of a remote accessible vote by mail system that is defective due to a known but undisclosed defect, fault, or failure, whether or not the remote
 accessible vote by mail system has been used in an election.

(B) A civil penalty from the offending party or parties, not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) per violation. For purposes of this subdivision, each defect, fault, or failure shall be considered a separate violation. A defect, fault, or failure constitutes a single violation regardless of the number of remote accessible vote by mail system units in which the defect, fault, or failure is found.

(C) In addition to any other penalties or remedies established by this section, the offending party or parties shall be liable in the amount of one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day after the applicable deadline established in Section 19290 until the required disclosure is filed with the Secretary of State.

(2) A penalty imposed pursuant to subparagraph (B) or (C) of paragraph (1) shall be deposited in the General Fund.

(c) Before seeking any measure of relief under this section, the Secretary of State shall hold a public hearing. The Secretary of State shall give notice of the hearing in the manner prescribed by Section 6064 of the Government Code in a newspaper of general circulation published in Sacramento County. The Secretary of State also shall transmit written notice of the hearing, at least 30 days prior to the hearing, to each county elections official, the offending party or parties, any persons that the Secretary of State believes will be interested in the hearing, and any persons who request, in writing, notice of the hearing.

(d) The decision of the Secretary of State to seek relief under this section shall be in writing and state his or her findings. The decision shall be open to public inspection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 75, Sec. 19.   (AB 2252)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

19294.

(a) The Secretary of State may seek injunctive relief requiring an elections official, or any vendor or manufacturer of a remote accessible vote by mail system, to comply with the requirements of this code, the regulations of the Secretary of State, and the specifications for the ballot marking system and its software, including the programs and procedures for vote marking and testing.

(b) Venue for a proceeding under this section shall be exclusively in Sacramento County.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 75, Sec. 20.   (AB 2252)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

19295.

A remote accessible vote by mail system or part of a remote accessible vote by mail system shall not do any of the following:

(a) Have the capability, including an optional capability, to use a remote server to mark a voter’s selections transmitted to the server from the voter’s computer via the Internet.

(b) Have the capability, including an optional capability, to store any voter identifiable selections on any remote server.

(c) Have the capability, including the optional capability, to tabulate votes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 75, Sec. 21.   (AB 2252)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Elections Using Voting Machines [19300. - 19381.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [19300. - 19304.]

19300.

A voting machine shall, except at a direct primary election or any election at which a candidate for voter-nominated office is to appear on the ballot, permit the voter to vote for all the candidates of one party or in part for the candidates of one party and in part for the candidates of one or more other parties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 1, Sec. 61.   (SB 6)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Operative January 1, 2011, pursuant to Sec. 67 of Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

19301.

(a) A voting machine shall provide in the general election for grouping under the name of the office to be voted on, all the candidates for the office with the designation of the parties, if any, by which they were respectively nominated or which they designated pursuant to Section 8002.5.

(b) With respect to a party-nominated office, the designation may be by usual or reasonable abbreviation of party names. With respect to a voter-nominated office, the voting machine shall conform to the format specified in subdivision (a) of Section 13105.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 3, Sec. 46.   (AB 1413)   Effective February 10, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

19302.

The labels on voting machines and the way in which candidates’ names are grouped shall conform as nearly as possible to the form of ballot provided for in elections where voting machines are not used.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

19303.

If the voting machine is so constructed that a voter can cast a vote in part for presidential electors of one party and in part for those of one or more other parties or those not nominated by any party, it may also be provided with: (a) one device for each party for voting for all the presidential electors of that party by one operation, (b) a ballot label therefor containing only the words “presidential electors” preceded by the name of the party and followed by the names of its candidates for the offices of President and Vice President, and (c) a registering device therefor which shall register the vote cast for the electors when thus voted collectively.

If a voting machine is so constructed that a voter can cast a vote in part for delegates to a national party convention of one party and in part for those of one or more other parties or those not nominated by any party, it may be provided with one device for each party for voting by one operation for each group of candidates to national conventions that may be voted for as a group according to the law governing presidential primaries.

No straight party voting device shall be used except for delegates to a national convention or for presidential electors.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

19304.

A write-in ballot shall be cast in its appropriate place on the machine, or it shall be void and not counted.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Pre-election Procedures [19320. - 19323.]

19320.

Before preparing a voting machine for any general election, the elections official shall mail written notice to the chairperson of the county central committee of at least two of the principal political parties, stating the time and place where machines will be prepared. At the specified time one representative of each of the political parties shall be afforded an opportunity to see that the machines are in proper condition for use in the election.

The party representatives shall be sworn to perform faithfully their duties but shall not interfere with the officials or assume any of their duties. When a machine has been so examined by the representatives, it shall be sealed with a numbered metal seal. The representatives shall certify to the number of the machines, whether all of the counters are set at zero (000), and the number registered on the protective counter and on the seal.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

19321.

The elections official shall affix ballot labels to the machines to correspond with the county voter information guide for the election. He or she shall employ competent persons to assist him or her in affixing the labels and in putting the machines in order. Each machine shall be tested to ascertain if it is operating properly.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 422, Sec. 82.   (AB 2911)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

19322.

When a voting machine has been properly prepared for an election, it shall be locked against voting and sealed. After that initial preparation, a member of the precinct board or some duly authorized person, other than the one preparing the machines, shall inspect each machine and submit a written report. The report shall note the following:

(1) Whether all of the registering counters are set at zero (000), (2) whether the machine is arranged in all respects in good order for the election, (3) whether the machine is locked, (4) the number on the protective counter, (5) the number on the seal. The keys shall be delivered to the election board together with a copy of the written report, made on the proper blanks, stating that the machine is in every way properly prepared for the election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

19323.

The elections official shall deliver to the polling place the supplies necessary to conduct the election, including two county voter information guides, one envelope containing the seal for sealing the machine after the polls are closed, one envelope for the return of the keys, and as many copies of the statement of votes cast as are necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 422, Sec. 83.   (AB 2911)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Precincts and Board Members [19340. - 19341.]

19340.

Any member of a precinct board who has not previously attended a training class in the use of the voting machines and the duties of a board member shall be required to do so, unless appointed to fill an emergency vacancy.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

19341.

The precinct board shall consist of one inspector and two judges who shall be appointed and compensated pursuant to the general election laws. One additional inspector or judge shall be appointed for each additional voting machine used in the polling place.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Procedures at the Polls [19360. - 19362.]

19360.

Before unsealing the envelope containing the keys and opening the doors concealing the counters the precinct board shall determine that the number on the seal on the machine and the number registered on the protective counter correspond to the numbers on the envelope.

Each member of the precinct board shall then carefully examine the counters to see that each registers zero (000). If the machine is provided with embossing, printing, or photography devices that record the readings of the counters the board shall, instead of opening the counter compartment, cause a “before election proofsheet” to be produced and determined by it that all counters register zero (000).

If any discrepancy is found in the numbers registered on the counters or the “before election proofsheet” the precinct board shall make, sign, and post a written statement attesting to this fact. In filling out the statement of return of votes cast, the precinct board shall subtract any number shown on the counter from the number shown on the counter at the close of the polls.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

19361.

The keys to the voting machines shall be delivered to the precinct board no later than 12 hours before the opening of the polls. They shall be in an envelope upon which is written the designation and location of the election precinct, the number of the voting machine, the number on the seal, and the number registered on the protective counter. The precinct board member receiving the key shall sign a receipt.

The envelope shall not be opened until at least two members of the precinct board are present to determine that the envelope has not been opened.

At the close of the polls the keys shall be placed in the envelope supplied by the official and the number of the machine, the number of the seal, the number registered on the protective counter, shall be written on the envelope.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

19362.

The exterior of the voting machine and every part of the polling place shall be in plain view of the election precinct board and the poll watchers. The ballot labels shall be clearly visible when the machine is not in use and shall be inspected by a member of the precinct board after each voter has left the booth. Each machine shall be at least four feet from the poll clerk’s table.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Closing the Polls [19371. - 19371.]

19371.

Before adjourning, the precinct board shall do all of the following:

(a) Comply with the requirements of Section 15250.5.

(b) Seal each voting machine with the seal or seals provided.

(c) Lock the voting machines.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 911, Sec. 14.   (AB 2631)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Counting Procedures [19380. - 19381.]

19380.

The statement of the result of votes cast, which shall be certified by the precinct board, shall contain:

(a) The total number of votes cast.

(b) The number of votes cast for each candidate and measure as shown on the statement of return of votes cast.

(c) The number of votes for persons not nominated.

(d) Printed directions to the precinct board for their guidance before the polls are opened and when the polls are closed.

(e) A certificate which
 shall be signed by the election officers before the polls are opened, showing:

(1) The delivery of the keys in a sealed envelope.

(2) The number on the seal or seals.

(3) The number registered on the protective counter.

(4) Whether all of the counters are set at zero (000).

(5) Whether the public counter is set at zero (000).

(f) A certificate that shall be filled out after the polls have been closed, showing:

(1) That the voting machine has been locked against voting and sealed.

(2) The number of
 voters as shown on the public counter.

(3) The number on the seal or seals.

(4) The number registered on the protective counter.

(5) That the voting machine is closed and locked.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19382 by Stats. 2014, Ch. 911, Sec. 17.   (AB 2631)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

19381.

The precinct board shall immediately transmit unsealed to the elections official a copy of the result of the votes cast at the polling place, the copy shall be signed by the members of the precinct board, and shall be open to public inspection.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19385 by Stats. 2014, Ch. 911, Sec. 20.   (AB 2631)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Voting System Replacement Contracts [19400. - 19402.]

19400.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Ballot on demand system” means a ballot manufacturing system, as defined in Section 303.4, that is subject to Sections 13004 and 13004.5.

(b) “Election management system” means a system that is used by a county in the state to track voter registration or voter preferences, including, for example, a voter’s vote by mail status. 

(c) “Electronic poll book” means an electronic list of registered voters that may be transported to the polling location or vote center pursuant to Section 2550.

(d) “Remote accessible vote by mail system”
 means a system, as defined in Section 303.3, that is certified pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 19280) of Division 19.

(e) “Vote by mail ballot drop box” means a secure receptacle established by a county or city and county elections official whereby a voted vote by mail ballot may be returned to the elections official from whom it was obtained pursuant to Section 3025.

(f) “Voting system” means any voting machine, voting device, or vote tabulating device that does not use prescored punch card ballots.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 78.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

19402.

(a) (1) The Secretary of State shall use the funds appropriated to the Secretary of State in the Budget Act of 2018 and the Budget Act of 2019 for voting system replacement for counties by awarding reimbursement contracts to counties using the funding allocation described in subdivision (b).

(2) To receive reimbursement for the eligible expenditures described in subdivision (d) made before July 1, 2020, or on or after July 1, 2021, a county shall provide matching funds that are at least equivalent to one-quarter of the state funds received for the eligible expenditures described in subdivision (d).

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), counties that operated 50 or fewer precincts in
 the November 8, 2016, statewide general election are not required to provide matching funds to receive an allocation from the state.

(4) To receive reimbursement for the eligible expenditures described in subdivision (d) made on or after July 1, 2020, and before July 1, 2021, a county shall not be required to provide matching funds.

(b) The Secretary of State shall allocate funding for a contract described in subdivision (a) based on the size of the county, the number of voters registered in the county, and the Secretary of State’s estimate of need for county voting equipment.

(c) A contract described in subdivision (a) shall permit a county to apply to the Secretary of State for reimbursement costs incurred in connection with the activities described in subdivision (d) in a manner consistent with all of the
 following:

(1) The county may seek reimbursement for payments made pursuant to a purchase agreement, lease agreement, or other contract made after April 29, 2015.

(2) The funded activities described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) shall be for new voting systems that have been certified pursuant to the California Voting System Standards.

(3) The county shall provide the Secretary of State with documentation of the payment for which reimbursement is sought, and of the purchase agreement, lease agreement, or other contract pursuant to which the reimbursed payment was made.

(4) The Secretary of State shall verify that payment for which reimbursement is sought meets the criteria set forth in the contract described in subdivision (a)
 before reimbursing the county.

(5) (A) For the eligible expenditures described in subdivision (d) made before July 1, 2020, or on or after July 1, 2021, the Secretary of State shall reimburse the county by matching county funds spent on voting system replacement activities described in subdivision (d) on a three-to-one basis, up to the maximum amount of funds allocated for the contract pursuant to subdivision (b).

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), the Secretary of State shall reimburse counties that operated 50 or fewer precincts in the November 8, 2016, statewide general election without requiring those counties to provide matching funds.

(C) For the eligible expenditures described in subdivision (d) made on or after July 1, 2020, and before July 1, 2021, the Secretary of State shall
 reimburse the county for eligible expenditures, up to the maximum amount of funds allocated for the contract pursuant to subdivision (b), without requiring the county to provide matching funds.

(d) For purposes of this chapter, reimbursable voting system replacement activities include all of the following:

(1) The purchase or lease of any of the following:

(A) A voting system certified or conditionally approved by the Secretary of State that does not use prescored punch card ballots.

(B) Electronic poll books certified by the Secretary of State.

(C) Ballot on demand systems certified by the Secretary of State.

(D) Vote by
 mail ballot drop boxes that comply with any applicable regulations adopted by the Secretary of State pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 3025.

(E) Remote accessible vote by mail systems certified or conditionally approved by the Secretary of State.

(F) Telecommunication technologies to facilitate electronic connection, for the purpose of voter registration, between polling places, vote centers, and the office of the county elections official or the Secretary of State’s office.

(G) Vote by mail ballot sorting and processing equipment.

(H) An election management system.

(2) Research and development of a new voting system that has not been certified or conditionally approved by the